Ohio, session 136, SB148.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That section 5534.675 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.675. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the northeastbound and southwestbound lanes of state route number two between the western border of Lake county and the eastern border of the municipal corporation of Willoughby, in Lake county, shall be known as the "Specialist Lloyd Andrew Sellers Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________